Utah statutes.
61-2c-106.   Addresses provided the division.

(1) (a)  A person shall provide a physical location or street address when the person provides the nationwide database an address required by the division.

(b)  The following when provided to and maintained within the division under this chapter is public information:

(i)  a business address; or

(ii)  a mailing address other than a home address, unless the person provides no other address.

(2)  A licensee is considered to have received a notification that is mailed to the last mailing address furnished to the nationwide database by:

(a)  the individual, if the licensee is an individual; or

(b)  the lending manager who is designated within the nationwide database to act as the principal lending manager for the entity, if the licensee is an entity.



Amended by Chapter 292, 2013 General Session

